Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.210

Supplementary superior court rules.

RCW 2.04.190 through 2.04.210 shall not be construed to deprive the superior courts of power to establish rules for their government supplementary to and not in conflict with the rules prescribed by the supreme court.

[ 1925 ex.s. c 118 s 3; RRS s 13-3.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 83(a); Cf. RAP 1.1.

Rules for government of superior courts: RCW 2.08.230, 2.16.040.